Oklahoma, session 2026, SB814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 14-115.6, as
last amended by Section 23, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (26 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 14-115.6), is amended to read as follows:
Section 14-115.6. A. A registered voter who, after the
deadline to request an absentee ballot as provided in Section 14-103
of this title, is deployed as either a first:
1. First responder or emergency worker to assist with the
rescue, recovery, or relief efforts of a declared natural disaster
or state of emergency,; or
2. Uniformed-service voter as defined in Section 14-137 of this
title,

may make a written request for an emergency absentee ballot in a
form prescribed by the Secretary of the State Election Board. The
request shall be signed by the voter and shall be provided by the
voter to the secretary of the county election board in the county
where the voter is registered. Requirements for matching of name,
birth date, and identification number established pursuant to
Section 14-105 of this title shall apply to a request for an
absentee ballot under this section.
B. Upon receipt of the voter’s request, the secretary of the
county election board shall issue to the voter the appropriate
ballots and envelopes required for voting an emergency absentee
ballot. Provided, the voter shall present proof of identity as
required by Section 7-114 of this title.
C. The ballots must be returned in person by the voter, by
United States mail, or by other means of delivery approved by the
Secretary of the State Election Board, to the secretary of the
county election board no later than 7:00 p.m. on the day of the
election.
D. Upon return of the absentee ballots, the secretary of the
county election board shall cause the ballots to be processed in the
same manner as is prescribed for other absentee ballots.
E. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall promulgate
rules to implement the procedures described in this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 814 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 12th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 814 Page 3